Washington statutes.
RCW 11.56.120

Conveyance after confirmation of sale.

Upon the confirmation of any such sale the court shall direct the personal representative to make, execute and deliver instruments conveying the title to the person to whom such property may be sold, and such instruments of conveyance shall be deemed to convey all the estate, rights and interests of the testator or intestate at the death of the deceased and any interest acquired by the estate.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.56.120. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 133; RRS s 1503; prior: Code 1881 s 1510; 1854 p 287 s 120.]